Massachusetts, session 194th, H3878.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 6B of chapter 115 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 19, 28 and 35, the figure “$2,000”,
each time it appears, and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following figure:-
$5,000.
SECTION 2. Said section 6B of said chapter 115, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the third paragraph the following paragraph:-
A veteran who suffers from post-traumatic stress disorder, symptoms of Persian Gulf
illness, or injuries connected to tainted, poisoned or adulterated water at Camp Lejeune and such
disorder, illness, or injuries have been certified by the Veterans’ Administration as service-
connected and who is determined to be 80 per cent disabled by the Veterans’ Administration
of 2

shall be paid the sum of $5,000 annually in 2 equal payments on August 1 and February 1. Such
payments shall be due and payable from the date of the application.
of 2